Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,246
Department of Economic Development; Legislative intent to appropriate.

It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate one hundred twenty-eight million seven hundred forty thousand one hundred seventy-eight dollars from federal funds for fiscal year 2022-23 to the Department of Economic Development to provide grants as provided in section 81-12,245. The federal funds described in this section are the funds allocated to the State of Nebraska from the federal Coronavirus Capital Projects Fund under the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021.

Laws 2022, LB1024, § 14.